Utah statutes.
59-24-103.   Tax imposed on radioactive waste.
(1)  Beginning on April 1, 2001 through June 30, 2003, there is imposed a tax
on radioactive waste received at a radioactive waste facility, as provided in
this chapter.
(2)  The tax is equal to the sum of the following amounts:
(a)  12% of the gross receipts received from the disposal of containerized
class A waste;
(b)  10% of the gross receipts received from the disposal of processed class A
waste;
(c)  5% of the gross receipts received from the disposal of uncontainerized,
unprocessed class A waste;
(d)  10 cents per cubic foot of alternate feed material received at a
radioactive waste facility for disposal or reprocessing; and
(e)  10 cents per cubic foot of byproduct material received at a radioactive
waste facility for disposal.
(3)  For purposes of the tax imposed by this section, a fraction of a cubic
foot is considered to be a full cubic foot.
(4)  The tax imposed by this section applies to:
(a)  gross receipts received:
(i)  pursuant to a contract entered into on or after April 30, 2001;
(ii)  pursuant to a contract substantially modified on or after April 30,
2001;
(iii)  pursuant to a contract renewed or extended on or after April 30, 2001;
(iv)  not pursuant to a contract; or
(v)  for the disposal of containerized class A waste; and
(b)  alternate feed material or byproduct material received:
(i)  pursuant to a contract entered into on or after April 30, 2001;
(ii)  pursuant to a contract substantially modified on or after April 30,
2001;
(iii)  pursuant to a contract renewed or extended on or after April 30, 2001;
or
(iv)  not pursuant to a contract.
(5)  The tax imposed by this section does not apply to radioactive waste
containing material classified as hazardous waste under 40 C.F.R. Part 261.
